Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2450
Power project agencies; sections applicable.

The provisions of sections 18-2451 to 18-2462 shall apply only to agencies created pursuant to sections 18-2426 to 18-2434 and shall not be construed to create any exceptions to the provisions of section 18-2449.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 50.